pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio > Aparelhos para exercícios aeróbicos: Elípticos; Bicicletas ergométricas; Simuladores de corda infinita; Remador ergométrico; Simuladores de esqui; Steppers; Esteiras; Escaladores verticais
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio > Machines de cardiotraining: Vélos elliptiques; Vélos d’appartement; Simulateurs de tirage de corde; Rameurs; Simulateurs de ski; Marchepieds et steps d’exercice; Tapis de course; Grimpeurs verticaux
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio > Cardio machine: Elliptical; Cyclette; Macchine per allenamento con corda; Vogatori; Simulatori di sci; Stepper; Tapis roulant; Simulatori di arrampicata verticali
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio > Sprzęt kardio: Orbitreki; Rowery treningowe; Trenażery linowe; Przyrządy do wiosłowania; Ergometry narciarskie; Steppery; Bieżnie; Trenażery wspinaczkowe
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu > Kuntoilulaitteet kestävyysharjoitteluun: Crosstrainerit; Kuntopyörät; Köysiharjoittelulaitteet; Soutulaitteet; Hiihtolaitteet; Porraslaitteet ja stepperit; Juoksumatot; Kiipeilylaitteet
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio > Kardio naprave: Eliptični trenažerji; Sobna kolesa; Vrvni trenažerji; Veslači; Trenažerji za smučanje; Stopnice in steperji; Tekalne steze; Vertikalni plezalniki
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness > Máquinas de cardiofitness: Bicicletas elípticas; Bicicletas de exercício; Máquinas de treino com corda; Máquinas de remo; Máquinas de esqui; Máquinas de escadas e steppers; Passadeiras; Máquinas de escalada verticais
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio > Máquinas de cardio: Bicicletas elípticas; Bicicletas estáticas; Entrenadores de cuerda; Máquinas de remo; Máquinas de esquí; Steps; Cintas para correr; Escaladoras verticales
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio > Cardioapparaten: Crosstrainers; Hometrainers; Ropetrainers; Roei-apparaten; Skitrainers; Trapklimmers en -steppers; Loopbanden; Vertical climbers
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio > Kardio sprave: Eliptični trenažeri; Sobni bicikli; Trenažeri s užetom; Sprave za veslanje; Trenažeri za skijanje; Stepere i simulatori za penjanje; Trake za trčanje; Vertikalni penjači
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio > Cardiogeräte: Crosstrainer; Heimtrainer; Seiltrainer; Rudergeräte; Skitrainer; Stair Climber & Stepper; Laufbänder; Vertical Climber
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ > เครื่องคาดิโอ: เครื่องอิลิปทิคอล; จักรยานออกกำลังกาย; เครื่องจำลองการดึงเชือก; เครื่องจำลองท่าพายเรือ; เครื่องจำลองการเล่นสกี; เครื่องปีนบันไดและสเต็ปเปอร์; ลู่วิ่ง; เครื่องปีนเขาแนวตั้ง
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오 > 심장 강화 운동 기구: 일립티컬 트레이너; 실내 운동용 자전거; 로프 트레이너; 로잉 머신; 스키 트레이너; 스테어 클라이머/스테퍼; 러닝머신; 버티컬 클라이머
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio > Cardio Machines: Elliptical Trainers; Exercise Bikes; Rope Trainers; Rowing Machines; Ski Trainers; Stair Climbers & Steppers; Treadmills; Vertical Climbers
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió > Kardiógépek: Elliptikus trénerek; Szobakerékpárok; Kötéltrénerek; Evezőgépek; Sítrénerek; Lépcsőzőgépek és taposógépek; Futópadok; Függőleges mászógépek
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo > Kardiyo Makineleri: Eliptik Bisikletler; Egzersiz Bisikletleri; Halat antrenman aletleri; Kürek Makineleri; Kayak antrenman aletleri; Merdiven Çıkma Egzersiz Makineleri; Koşu Bantları; Dikey tırmanma aletleri
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio > Trenažéry: Eliptické trenažery; Rotopedy; Lanové trenažéry; Veslařské trenažéry; Lyžařské trenažéry; Steppery; Běžecké trenažéry; Vertikální horolezecké trenažéry
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim > Máy tập cardio: Máy tập đạp xe; Xe đạp tập thể dục; Máy tập kéo dây; Máy chèo thuyền; Máy tập trượt tuyết; Máy trèo và leo cầu thang; Máy chạy bộ điện; Máy tập leo núi đứng
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio > Kardiomaskiner: Ellipsemaskiner; Ergometersykler; Taumaskiner; Romaskiner; Stakemaskiner; Trappe- og stepmaskiner; Tredemøller; Vertikale klatremaskiner
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie > Stroje na kardio tréning: Eliptické trenažéry; Rotopedy; Lanové trenažéry; Veslovacie trenažéry; Lyžiarske trenažéry; Nekonečné schody a stepery; Bežecké pásy; Vertikálne lezecké trenažéry
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки > Кардиотренажеры: Эллиптические тренажеры; Велотренажеры; Канатные тренажеры; Гребные тренажеры; Лыжные тренажеры; Тренажеры-лестницы и степперы; Беговые дорожки; Вертикальные климберы
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės > Kardiotreniruokliai: Elipsiniai treniruokliai; Dviračių treniruokliai; Virvių treniruokliai; Irklavimo treniruokliai; Slidinėjimo treniruokliai; Laiptų ir žingsniavimo treniruokliai; Bėgimo takeliai; Vertikalūs kopimo treniruokliai
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動 > フィットネスマシン: エリプティカルマシン; エアロバイク; ロープトレーナー; ローイングマシン; スキートレーナー; ステアクライマー・ステッパー; トレッドミル; バーティカルクライマー
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio > Aparate pentru cardio: Biciclete eliptice; Biciclete statice; Aparate cu frânghie de antrenament; Aparate de vâslit; Simulatoare de schi; Scări rulante și steppere pentru fitness; Benzi de alergare; Aparate de cățărat vertical
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動 > 心肺訓練器材: 橢圓機; 腳踏健身車; 攀繩機; 划船機; 滑雪訓練機; 登山機; 跑步機; 垂直攀爬機
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio > Cardio-maskiner: Crosstrainer; Motionscykler; Rebtrænere; Romaskiner; Skitrænere; Trappemaskiner; Løbebånd; Vertikale klatremaskiner
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки > Уреди за кардио тренировки: Елиптични тренажори; Велоергометри; Въжени тренажори; Гребни тренажори; Тренажори за ски; Уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери; Бягащи пътеки; Тренажори за вертикално катерене
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动 > 有氧运动机: 椭圆机; 健身自行车; 绳索训练机; 划船机; 滑雪训练机; 扭腰踏步机; 跑步机; 攀岩机
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning > Maskiner för kardioträning: Elliptiska träningsmaskiner; Träningscyklar; Repmaskiner; Roddmaskiner; Stakmaskiner; Trappmaskiner; Löpband; Klättermaskiner
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης: Ελλειπτικά μηχανήματα; Ποδήλατα γυμναστικής; Μηχανήματα προπόνησης με σχοινί; Κωπηλατικά μηχανήματα; Μηχανήματα προπόνησης σκι; Αναρριχητήρες με σκάλες & βηματιστήρες; Διάδρομοι γυμναστικής; Μηχανήματα κάθετης αναρρίχησης